District of Columbia statutes.
4-123

Discharge from guardianship.

The Board of Public Welfare shall have power, upon proper showing, in its discretion, to discharge from guardianship any child committed to its care.

History

Mar. 2, 1927, 44 Stat. 1323, ch. 271

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 3-124.
1973 Ed., § 3-125.

References in Text

Board of Public Welfare abolished: See note to § 3-102.